da: Hjulprofil: Ikke-mærkende; Pneumatisk; Med riller; Glat; Med mønster; Andet
nb: Hjulmønsterstil: Ikke-merker; Pneumatisk; Med riller; Glatt; Riflet; Annet
es: Estilo de la banda de rodadura de la rueda: Sin marcas; Neumático; Acanalado; Suave; Grabada; Otros
sk-SK: Štýl dezénu kolesa: Nezanecháva značky; Pneumatický; Vrúbkovaný; Hladký; Profilovaný; Iné
zh-TW: 車輪胎面樣式: 無標記; 氣動的; 羅紋; 光滑; 防滑紋; 其他
ja: 車輪のトレッドスタイル: マーキングなし; ニューマチック; リブ付き; スムース; トレッド; その他
th: รูปแบบดอกยางของล้อ: ไม่ทิ้งร่องรอย; นิวเมติก; แบบร่อง; เรียบ; ดอกยาง; อื่นๆ
tr: Tekerlek sırt deseni: İz bırakmayan; Pnömatik; Fitilli; Pürüzsüz; Dişli; Diğer
nl: Wielprofielstijl: Streeploos; Pneumatisch; Geribbeld; Glad; Met profiel; Overig
el: Σχέδιο πέλματος τροχού: Μη σήμανση; Pneumatic; Ραβδωτό; Λείο; Με πέλμα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vzorec profila kolesa: Neoznačevanje; Pnevmatski; Rebrasta; Gladka; Profilirano; Druga
vi: Kiểu gai bánh xe: Không để lại vết; Khí nén; Có gân; Nhẵn; Có rãnh; Khác
en: Wheel tread style: Non-Marking; Pneumatic; Ribbed; Smooth; Treaded; Other
de: Radprofilart: Nicht markierend; Pneumatisch; Gerippt; Glatt; Profiliert; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Estilo do piso da roda: Não deixa marcas; Pneumático; Canelado; Macio; Com relevo; Outro
hr-HR: Stil gazišta kotača: Ne ostavlja tragove; Pneumatski; Rebrasta; Glatka; Gazište; Ostalo
sv: Hjulmönster: Icke-märkande; Pneumatisk; Ribbad; Slät; Mönstrad; Annat
fr: Style de la bande de roulement de roue: Non marquant; Pneumatique; Nervuré; Lisse; Cranté; Autre
cs: Dezén kola: Nezanechává stopy; Pneumatika; Žebrování; Hladký běhoun; Dezén; Jiné
ko: 휠 트레드 스타일: 논-마킹; 공압식; 골이 있는; 매끄러운; 트레드형; 기타
ru: Тип протектора колеса: Не оставляющий следов; Пневматический; Ребристый; Гладкий; С рисунком; Другое
lt-LT: Rato protektoriaus tipas: Nepaliekantis žymių; Pneumatinis; Briaunotas; Glotnus; Su protektoriumi; Kita
pl: Typ bieżnika koła: Niebrudzące; Pneumatyczne; Żebrowane; Gładkie; Bieżnikowane; Inne
it: Stile del battistrada della ruota: Non marcante; Pneumatico; A coste; Liscio; Zigrinata; Altro
hu: Kerék futófelületének stílusa: Nem hagy nyomot; Pneumatikus; Bordázott; Sima; Recés; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип протектор на колелото: Неоставящо следи; Пневматично; Оребрено; Гладко; Релефно; Друго
fi: Pyörän kulutuspinnan tyyli: Merkkejä jättämätön; Paineilmalla täytettävä; Harjanteinen; Sileä; Uritettu; Muu
ro-RO: Stilul benzii de rulare a roții: Fără urme; Pneumatic; Nervurat; Neted; Profilat; Altele
pt-BR: Estilo de banda de rodagem da roda: Não deixa marcas; Pneumático; Com nervuras; Suave; Com ranhuras; Outro
zh-CN: 车轮胎面花纹样式: 无痕; 充气式; 棱纹; 光面; 条纹; 其他